Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-109] Sanctions. (a) Any insurer
failing without just cause to timely file the own risk and solvency assessment
summary report as required in this article shall be required after notice and hearing
to pay a penalty of not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each day's delay,
which shall be recovered by the commissioner. Any penalty recovered pursuant
to this section shall be paid into the compliance resolution fund.

(b) The maximum penalty under this section is $50,000.
The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to the commissioner
that imposing the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer.
[L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next